Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 35 Military Justice
35.282.
Deferment of sentences.

On application by an accused who is under sentence to confinement that has not been ordered executed, the convening authority or, if the accused is no longer under that person’s jurisdiction, the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned, may in that person’s sole discretion defer service of the sentence of confinement. The deferment shall terminate when the sentence is ordered executed. The deferment may be rescinded at any time by the person who granted it or, if the accused is no longer under that person’s jurisdiction, by the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned.

In any case in which a court-martial sentences an accused referred to in paragraph (b) of this subsection to confinement, the convening authority may defer the service of the sentence to confinement, without the consent of the accused, until after the accused has been permanently released to the state military forces by a state, the United States, or a foreign country referred to in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection applies to a person subject to this code who:

While in the custody of a state, the United States, or a foreign country is temporarily returned by that state, the United States, or a foreign country to the state military forces for trial by court-martial; and

After the court-martial, is returned to that state, the United States, or a foreign country under the authority of an agreement or treaty, as the case may be.

In this subsection, the term “state” includes the District of Columbia and any commonwealth, territory, or possession of the United States.

In any case in which a court-martial sentences an accused to confinement and the sentence to confinement has been ordered executed, but in which review of the case under KRS

35.333

is pending, the adjutant general may defer further service of the sentence to confinement while that review is pending.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 60, effective June 25, 2013.

35.285.
Execution of confinement.

A sentence of confinement adjudged by a court-martial, whether or not the sentence includes discharge or dismissal, and whether or not the discharge or dismissal has been executed, may be carried into execution by confinement in any place authorized by this code. Persons so confined are subject to the same discipline and treatment as persons regularly confined or committed to that place.

No place of confinement may require payment of any fee or charge for receiving or confining a person except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 56; 1962, ch. 159, § 1; 1970, ch. 56, § 41; 1982, ch. 385, § 14, effective July 1, 1982; 2013, ch. 32, § 61, effective June 25, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Jailer’s fees attributed to military prisoners of Kentucky should be paid out of the state treasury.

OAG 64-460

.

Prisoners who are members of the national guard, not on extended active federal duty, for the purpose of jailer’s fees, are state prisoners and the the fees should be paid out of the state treasury.

OAG 64-460

.

35.289.
Sentences: reduction in enlisted grade upon approval.

A court-martial sentence of an enlisted member in a pay grade above E-1, as approved by the convening authority, shall reduce that member to pay grade E-1, effective on the date of that approval, when it includes:

A dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge; or

Confinement.

If the sentence of a member who is reduced in pay grade under subsection (1) of this section is set aside or disapproved, or, as finally approved, does not include any punishment named in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, the rights and privileges of which the person was deprived because of that reduction shall be restored, including pay and allowances.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 62, effective June 25, 2013.

35.290.
Approval of sentences required — Suspension or commutation of sentences. [Repealed.]

35.294.
Sentences: forfeiture of pay and allowances during confinement.

A court-martial sentence described in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall result in the forfeiture of pay, or of pay and allowances, due that member during any period of confinement or parole. The forfeiture pursuant to this article shall take effect on the date determined under KRS

35.282

and may be deferred as provided by that section. The pay and allowances forfeited, in the case of a general court-martial, shall be all pay and allowances due that member during that period and, in the case of a special court-martial, shall be two-thirds (2/3) of all pay due that member during that period.

A sentence covered by this section is any sentence that includes:

Confinement for more than six (6) months; or

Confinement for six (6) months or less and a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge or dismissal.

In a case involving an accused who has dependents, the convening authority or other person acting under KRS

35.326

may waive any or all of the forfeitures of pay and allowances required by subsection (1) of this section for a period not to exceed six (6) months. Any amount of pay or allowances that, except for a waiver under this subsection, would be forfeited shall be paid, as the convening authority or other person taking action directs, to the dependents of the accused.

If the sentence of a member who forfeits pay and allowances under subsection (1) of this section is set aside or disapproved or, as finally approved, does not provide for a punishment referred to in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the member shall be paid the pay and allowances which the member would have been paid, except for the forfeiture, for the period during which the forfeiture was in effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 63, effective June 25, 2013.

35.295.
Record to be forwarded to reviewing authority. [Repealed.]

35.300.
Record to be referred to state judge advocate for opinion. [Repealed.]

35.305.
Return of record for reconsideration or revision. [Repealed.]

35.310.
Rehearings. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.315.
Approval of findings by convening authority. [Repealed.]

35.320.
Disposition of record after review by convening authority. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.325.
Error of law — Lesser included offense.

A finding or sentence of a court-martial may not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

A reviewing authority with the power to approve or affirm a finding of guilty may approve or affirm, instead, so much of the finding as includes a lesser included offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 64, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 64, effective June 25, 2013.

35.326.
Action by the convening authority.

The findings and sentence of a court-martial shall be reported promptly to the convening authority after the announcement of the sentence.

The accused may submit to the convening authority matters for consideration by the convening authority with respect to the findings and the sentence. Any such submission shall be in writing. Such a submission shall be made within ten (10) days after the accused has been given an authenticated record of trial and, if applicable, the recommendation of a judge advocate under subsection (4) of this section.

If the accused shows that additional time is required for the accused to submit such matters, the convening authority or other person taking action under this section, for good cause, may extend the applicable period under paragraph (a) of this subsection for not more than an additional twenty (20) days.

The accused may waive the right to make a submission to the convening authority under paragraph (a) of this subsection. A waiver must be made in writing and may not be revoked. For the purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, the time within which the accused may make a submission under this subsection shall be deemed to have expired upon the submission of a waiver to the convening authority.

The authority under this section to modify the findings and sentence of a court-martial is a matter of command prerogative involving the sole discretion of the convening authority. If it is impractical for the convening authority to act, the convening authority shall forward the case to a person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction who may take action under this section.

Action on the sentence of a court-martial shall be taken by the convening authority or by another person authorized to act under this section. The action may be taken only after consideration of any matters submitted by the accused under subsection (2) of this section or after the time for submitting such matters expires, whichever is earlier. The convening authority or other person taking the action, in that person’s sole discretion, may approve, disapprove, commute, or suspend the sentence in whole or in part.

Action on the findings of a court-martial by the convening authority or other person acting on a sentence is not required. However, such person, in the person’s sole discretion, may:

Dismiss any charge or specification by setting aside a finding of guilty thereto; or

Change a finding of guilty to a charge or specification to a finding of guilty to any offense that is a lesser included offense of the offense stated in the charge or specification.

Before acting under this section on any general or special court-martial case in which there is a finding of guilty, the convening authority or other person taking action under this section shall obtain and consider the written recommendation of a judge advocate. The convening authority or other person taking action under this section shall refer the record of trial to the judge advocate, and the judge advocate shall use that record in the preparation of the recommendation. The recommendation of the judge advocate shall include such matters as may be prescribed by regulation and shall be served on the accused, who may submit any matter in response under subsection (2) of this section. Failure to object in the response to the recommendation or to any matter attached to the recommendation waives the right to object thereto.

The convening authority or other person taking action under this section, in the person’s sole discretion, may order a proceeding in revision or a rehearing.

A proceeding in revision may be ordered if there is an apparent error or omission in the record or if the record shows improper or inconsistent action by a court-martial with respect to the finding or sentence that can be rectified without material prejudice to the substantial rights of the accused. In no case, however, may a proceeding in revision:

Reconsider a finding of not guilty of any specification or a ruling which amounts to a finding of not guilty;

Reconsider a finding of not guilty of any charge, unless there has been a finding of guilty under a specification laid under that charge, which sufficiently alleges a violation of some section of this code; or

Increase the severity of the sentence unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

A rehearing may be ordered by the convening authority or other person taking action under this article if that person disapproves the findings and sentence and states the reasons for disapproval of the findings. If that person disapproves the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, that person shall dismiss the charges. A rehearing as to the findings may not be ordered where there is a lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings. A rehearing as to the sentence may be ordered if the convening authority or other person taking action under this subsection disapproves the sentence.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 65, effective June 25, 2013.

35.327.
Withdrawal of appeal.

In each case subject to appellate review under this code, the accused may file with the convening authority a statement expressly withdrawing the right of the accused to an appeal. A withdrawal shall be signed by both the accused and his defense counsel and must be filed in accordance with appellate procedures as provided by law.

The accused may withdraw an appeal at any time in accordance with appellate procedures as provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 66, effective June 25, 2013.

35.328.
Appeal by the state.

In a trial by court-martial in which a punitive discharge may be adjudged, the state may appeal the following, other than a finding of not guilty with respect to the charge or specification by the members of the court-martial, or by a judge in a bench trial so long as it is not made in reconsideration:

An order or ruling of the military judge which terminates the proceedings with respect to the charge or specification;

An order or ruling which excludes evidence that is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding;

An order or ruling which directs the disclosure of classified information;

An order or ruling which imposes sanctions for nondisclosure of classified information;

A refusal of the military judge to issue a protective order sought by the state to prevent the disclosure of classified information; and

A refusal by the military judge to enforce an order described in subparagraph 5. of this paragraph that has previously been issued by the appropriate authority.

An appeal of an order or ruling may not be taken unless the trial counsel provides the military judge with written notice of appeal from the order or ruling within seventy-two (72) hours of the order or ruling. The notice shall include a certification by the trial counsel that the appeal is not taken for the purpose of delay and, if the order or ruling appealed is one which excludes evidence, that the evidence excluded is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding.

An appeal under this section shall be diligently prosecuted as provided by law.

An appeal under this section shall be forwarded to the court prescribed in KRS

35.333

. In ruling on an appeal under this section, that court may act only with respect to matters of law.

Any period of delay resulting from an appeal under this section shall be excluded in deciding any issue regarding denial of a speedy trial unless an appropriate authority determines that the appeal was filed solely for the purpose of delay with the knowledge that it was totally frivolous and without merit.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 67, effective June 25, 2013.

35.329.
Rehearings.

Each rehearing under this code shall take place before a court-martial composed of members who were not members of the court-martial which first heard the case. Upon a rehearing the accused may not be tried for any offense of which the accused was found not guilty by the first court-martial, and no sentence in excess of or more severe than the original sentence may be approved, unless the sentence is based upon a finding of guilty of an offense not considered upon the merits in the original proceedings, or unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory. If the sentence approved after the first court-martial was in accordance with a pretrial agreement and the accused at the rehearing changes a plea with respect to the charges or specifications upon which the pretrial agreement was based, or otherwise does not comply with the pretrial agreement, the approved sentence as to those charges or specifications may include any punishment not in excess of that lawfully adjudged at the first court-martial.

History.

Repealed, reenacted, and amended Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 68, effective June 25, 2013.

35.330.
Approval of finding on lesser included offense. [Repealed.]

35.331.
Review by the senior force judge advocate.

Each general and special court-martial case in which there has been a finding of guilty shall be reviewed by the senior force judge advocate, or a designee. The senior force judge advocate or designee may not review a case under this subsection if that person has acted in the same case as an accuser, investigating officer, member of the court, military judge, or counsel or has otherwise acted on behalf of the prosecution or defense. The senior force judge advocate’s review shall be in writing and shall contain the following:

Conclusions as to whether:

The court had jurisdiction over the accused and the offense;

The charge and specification stated an offense; and

The sentence was within the limits prescribed as a matter of law;

A response to each allegation of error made in writing by the accused; and

If the case is sent for action under subsection (2) of this section, a recommendation as to the appropriate action to be taken and an opinion as to whether corrective action is required as a matter of law.

The record of trial and related documents in each case reviewed under subsection (1) of this section shall be sent for action to the adjutant general if:

The judge advocate who reviewed the case recommends corrective action;

The sentence approved under KRS 35.326(3) extends to dismissal, a bad-conduct or dishonorable discharge, or confinement for more than six (6) months; or

Action is otherwise required by regulations of the adjutant general.

The adjutant general may:

Disapprove or approve the findings or sentence, in whole or in part;

Remit, commute, or suspend the sentence in whole or in part;

Except where the evidence was insufficient at the trial to support the findings, order a rehearing on the findings, on the sentence, or on both; or

Dismiss the charges.

If a rehearing is ordered but the convening authority finds a rehearing impracticable, the convening authority shall dismiss the charges.

If the opinion of the senior force judge advocate, or designee, in the senior force judge’s review under subsection (1) of this section is that corrective action is required as a matter of law and if the adjutant general does not take action that is at least as favorable to the accused as that recommended by the judge advocate, the record of trial and action thereon shall be sent to the Governor for review and action as deemed appropriate.

The senior force judge advocate, or a designee, may review any case in which there has been a finding of not guilty of all charges and specifications. The senior force judge advocate, or designee, may not review a case under this subsection if that person has acted in the same case as an accuser, investigating officer, member of the court, military judge, or counsel or has otherwise acted on behalf of the prosecution or defense. The senior force judge advocate’s review shall be limited to questions of subject matter jurisdiction.

The record of trial and related documents in each case reviewed under subsection (4) of this section shall be sent to the adjutant general. The adjutant general may:

When subject matter jurisdiction is found to be lacking, void the court-martial ab initio, with or without prejudice to the government, as the adjutant general deems appropriate; or

Return the record of trial and related documents to the senior force judge advocate for appeal by the government as provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 69, effective June 25, 2013.

35.332.
Disposition of records after review by the convening authority.

Except as otherwise required by this code, all records of trial and related documents shall be transmitted and disposed of as prescribed by regulation and provided by law.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 70, effective June 25, 2013.

35.333.
Review by state appellate authority.

Final decisions of a court-martial shall be deemed the statutory equivalent of a Circuit Court decision. The appellate procedures to be followed shall be those provided by law for the appeal of criminal cases.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 71, effective June 25, 2013.

35.334.
Appellate counsel.

The senior force judge advocate shall detail a judge advocate as appellate government counsel to represent the state in the review or appeal of cases specified in KRS

35.333

and before any federal court when requested to do so by the state Attorney General. Appellate government counsel must be a member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of the state to which the appeal is taken.

Upon an appeal by the state, an accused has the right to be represented by detailed military counsel before any reviewing authority and before any appellate court.

Upon the appeal by an accused, the accused has the right to be represented by military counsel before any reviewing authority.

Upon the request of an accused entitled to be so represented, the senior force judge advocate shall appoint a judge advocate to represent the accused in the review or appeal of cases specified in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

An accused may be represented by civilian appellate counsel at no expense to the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 72, effective June 25, 2013.

35.335.
Counsel for accused before reviewing authority. [Repealed.]

35.336.
Execution of sentence — Suspension of sentence.

If the sentence of the court-martial extends to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge and if the right of the accused to appellate review is not waived, and an appeal is not withdrawn under KRS

35.327

, that part of the sentence extending to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge may not be executed until there is a final judgment as to the legality of the proceedings. A judgment as to the legality of the proceedings is final in such cases when review is completed by an appellate court prescribed in KRS

35.333

, and is deemed final by the law of the state where the judgment was had.

If the sentence of the court-martial extends to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge and if the right of the accused to appellate review is waived, or an appeal is withdrawn under KRS

35.327

, that part of the sentence extending to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge may not be executed until review of the case by the senior force judge advocate and any action on that review under KRS

35.331

is completed. Any other part of the court-martial sentence may be ordered executed by the convening authority or other person acting on the case under KRS

35.326

when so approved under that section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 73, effective June 25, 2013.

35.340.
Vacation of suspension.

Before the vacation of the suspension of a special court-martial sentence, which as approved includes a bad-conduct discharge, or of any general court-martial sentence, the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer shall hold a hearing on the alleged violation of probation. The probationer shall be represented at the hearing by military counsel if the probationer so desires.

The record of the hearing and the recommendation of the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction shall be sent for action to the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer. If the officer vacates the suspension, any unexecuted part of the sentence, except a dismissal, shall be executed, subject to applicable restrictions in this code.

The suspension of any other sentence may be vacated by any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 67; 1970, ch. 56, § 47; 2013, ch. 32, § 74, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Application, to sentence by court-martial, of federal statute (28 USCS § 2255) dealing with vacation of sentence in criminal case. 20 A.L.R.2d 998.

35.345.
Petition for a new trial.

At any time within two (2) years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence the accused may petition the adjutant general for a new trial on grounds of newly discovered evidence or fraud in the court-martial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 68; 1970, ch. 56, § 48; 2013, ch. 32, § 75, effective June 25, 2013.

35.350.
Remission and suspension.

Any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted part of any sentence, including all uncollected forfeitures other than a sentence approved by the Governor.

The Governor may, for good cause, substitute an administrative form of discharge for a discharge or dismissal executed in accordance with the sentence of a court-martial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 69; 1970, ch. 56, § 49; 2013, ch. 32, § 76, effective June 25, 2013.

35.355.
Restoration.

Under such regulations as may be prescribed, all rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence which has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and such executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon the new trial or rehearing.

If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the Governor may substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of the accused’s enlistment.

If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the Governor may substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance, and the commissioned officer dismissed by that sentence may be reappointed by the Governor alone to such commissioned grade and with such rank as in the opinion of the Governor that former officer would have attained had he not been dismissed. The reappointment of such a former officer shall be without regard to the existence of a vacancy and shall affect the promotion status of other officers only insofar as the Governor may direct. All time between the dismissal and the reappointment shall be considered as actual service for all purposes, including the right to pay and allowances.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 70; 1970, ch. 56, § 50; 2013, ch. 32, § 77, effective June 25, 2013.

35.360.
Finality of proceedings, findings, and sentences.

The appellate review of records of trial provided by this code, the proceedings, findings, and sentences of courts-martial as approved, reviewed, or affirmed as required by this code, and all dismissals and discharges carried into execution under sentences by courts-martial following the approval, review, or affirmation as required by this code, are final and conclusive. Orders publishing the proceedings of courts-martial and all action taken pursuant to those proceedings are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the United States and the several states, subject only to action upon a petition for a new trial as provided in KRS

35.345

and to action under KRS

35.350

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 71; 1970, ch. 56, § 51; 2013, ch. 32, § 78, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Review by civil courts of court-martial convictions. 15 A.L.R.2d 387.

Review by federal civil courts of court-martial convictions — modern status. 95 A.L.R. Fed. 472.

Use of prior military conviction to establish repeat offender status, 11 A.L.R.5th 218.

35.364.
Leave required to be taken pending review of certain court-martial convictions.

Under regulations prescribed, an accused who has been sentenced by a court-martial may be required to take leave pending completion of action under this section if the sentence, as approved under KRS

35.326

, includes an unsuspended dismissal or an unsuspended dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge. The accused may be required to begin that leave on the date on which the sentence is approved under KRS

35.326

or at any time after that date, and the leave may be continued until the date on which action under this section is completed or may be terminated at an earlier time.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 79, effective June 25, 2013.

35.365.
State judge advocate to supervise administration of military justice. [Repealed.]

35.367.
Determination of lack of mental capacity or mental responsibility.

The determination of lack of mental capacity or mental responsibility shall be determined pursuant to Kentucky state law as well as regulations of the Department of Defense of the United States and the laws of the United States governing the Armed Forces of the United States as required under the Kentucky Constitution.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 80, effective June 25, 2013.

35.370.
Direct communication between convening authorities, judge advocates and legal officers. [Repealed.]

35.375.
Courts of inquiry. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.380.
Authority to administer oaths. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.385.
Code to be explained and text furnished to personnel. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.390.
Complaints of wrongs. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.395.
Redress for damage to property. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.400.
Marshals. [Repealed.]

35.405.
Process and mandates of military courts. [Repealed.]

35.410.
Payment and disposition of fines. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.415.
Immunity from prosecution for action of military court. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.420.
Jurisdiction of military courts presumed. [Repealed.]

35.425.
Delegation of Governor’s authority. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.430.
Short title of code. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.435.
Code not to affect offenses, penalties, forfeitures, fines or liabilities committed or incurred prior to July 1, 1954. [Repealed.]

35.436.
Application of substantive provisions to persons in duty status only. [Repealed.]

35.440.
Principals.

Any subject person is a principal who:

Commits an offense punishable by this code, or aids, abets, counsels, commands, or procures its commission; or

Causes an act to be done which if directly performed by the person would be punishable by this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 87, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 81, effective June 25, 2013.

35.442.
Accessory after the fact.

Any person subject to this code who, knowing that an offense punishable by this code has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent the person’s apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 82, effective June 25, 2013.

35.445.
Conviction of lesser included offense.

An accused may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included in the offense charged or of an attempt to commit either the offense charged or an offense necessarily included therein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 88, effective July 1, 1954; 1970, ch. 56, § 57; 2013, ch. 32, § 83, effective June 25, 2013.

35.450.
Attempts.

An act, done with specific intent to commit an offense under this code, amounting to more than mere preparation and tending, even though failing, to effect its commission, is an attempt to commit that offense.

Any person subject to this code who attempts to commit any offense punishable by this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed.

Any person subject to this code may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears on the trial that the offense was consummated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 89, effective July 1, 1954; 2013, ch. 32, § 84, effective June 25, 2013.

35.451.
Conspiracy.

Any person subject to this code who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this code shall, if one or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 58; 2013, ch. 32, § 85, effective June 25, 2013.

35.455.
Perjury. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.460.
Conduct constituting desertion. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.461.
Absence without leave. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.462.
Missing movement. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.465.
Mutiny — Sedition — Failure to suppress or report either. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.470.
Solicitation.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to desert in violation of KRS

35.473

, or mutiny in violation of KRS

35.577

, shall, if the offense solicited or advised is attempted or committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed or attempted, the person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to commit an act of misbehavior before the enemy in violation of KRS

35.600

or sedition in violation of KRS

35.577

shall, if the offense solicited or advised is committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed, the person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 99, § 93; 1970, ch. 56, § 64; 2013, ch. 32, § 86, effective June 25, 2013.

35.471.
Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Procures his or her own enlistment or appointment in the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

Procures his or her own separation from the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her eligibility for that separation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 65; 2013, ch. 32, § 87, effective June 25, 2013.

35.472.
Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person subject to this code who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the state military forces of any person who is known to him or her to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation or order shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 66; 2013, ch. 32, § 88, effective June 25, 2013.

35.473.
Desertion.

Any member of the state military forces is guilty of desertion who:

Without proper authority goes or remains absent from the member’s unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to remain away from there permanently;

Quits the member’s unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or

Without being regularly separated from one (1) of the state military forces enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one (1) of the state military forces, or in one (1) of the Armed Forces of the United States, without fully disclosing the fact the member has not been regularly separated, or enters any foreign armed service except when authorized by the United States.

Any commissioned officer of the state military forces who, after tender of the officer’s resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his or her post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away therefrom permanently is guilty of desertion.

Any person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished, if the offense is committed in time of war, by confinement of not more than ten (10) years or such other punishment as a court-martial may direct, but if the desertion or attempt to desert occurs at any other time, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 60, effective June 25, 2013.

35.474.
Absence without leave.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs who, without authority:

Fails to go to the appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

Goes from that place; or

Absents himself or herself or remains absent from the unit, organization , or place of duty at which the person is required to be at the time prescribed.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 90, effective June 25, 2013.

35.475.
Punishment for misconduct unbecoming an officer. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.4751.
Missing movement.

Any person subject to this code who through neglect or design misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which the person is required in the course of duty to move shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 62, effective June 25, 2013.

35.476.
Contempt toward officials.

Any person subject to this code who uses contemptuous words against the President or the Governor which may detrimentally affect the morale or effectiveness of any unit of the state military forces shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 67; 2013, ch. 32, § 92, effective June 25, 2013.

35.478.
Disrespect toward superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who behaves with disrespect toward the person’s superior commissioned officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 93, effective June 25, 2013.

35.480.
Insubordination by warrant officer or enlisted person. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.481.
Assaulting or willfully disobeying superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who:

Strikes the person’s superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against the superior commissioned officer while he or she is in the execution of his or her office; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful command of the person’s superior commissioned officer;

shall be punished, if the offense is committed in time of war, by confinement of not more than ten (10) years or such other punishment as a court-martial may direct, and if the offense is committed at any other time, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 68; 2013, ch. 32, § 94, effective June 25, 2013.

35.485.
Improper handling of military property. [Repealed.]

35.486.
Insubordinate conduct toward warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer.

Any warrant officer or enlisted member is guilty of any of the following offenses and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Strikes or assaults a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, while that officer is in the execution of his or her office;

Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer; or

Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer while that officer is in the execution of his or her office.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 95, effective June 25, 2013.

35.490.
Disorders and neglects. [Repealed.]